Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3142
HCBS Enhanced FMAP Fund; created; use; investment.

The HCBS Enhanced FMAP Fund is created. The fund shall be used to enhance and expand home and community-based services (HCBS) spending as outlined in the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 802, as amended. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature and any gifts, grants, or bequests for such purposes from any source, including federal, state, public, and private sources. Any money in the fund available for investment may be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2023, LB818, § 37.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.